Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-104.17
Child born out of wedlock; petition; evidence of compliance required; notice to biological father; when.

In all cases of adoption of a minor child born out of wedlock, the petition for adoption shall specifically allege compliance with sections 43-104.08 to 43-104.16, and all documents which are evidence of such compliance shall be filed with the court prior to the hearing on the petition. No notice of the filing of the petition to finalize or the hearing on the petition shall be given to a biological father or putative biological father who (1) executed a valid relinquishment and consent or a valid denial of paternity and waiver of rights pursuant to section 43-104.11, (2) was a putative father provided notice under sections 43-104.12 to 43-104.14 and who failed to timely file a Notice of Objection to Adoption and Intent to Obtain Custody pursuant to section 43-104.02, (3) was a putative, acknowledged, or adjudicated father who failed to timely file a petition objecting to the adoption under section 43-104.05, or (4) is not required to consent to the adoption pursuant to proceedings conducted under section 43-104 or 43-104.22.

Laws 1995, LB 712, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 16;

Laws 2022, LB741, § 18.